Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.190

Information on autism.

(1) To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, by September 1, 2008, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the department of health, the department of social and health services, educational service districts, local school districts, the autism center at the University of Washington, and the autism society of Washington, shall distribute information on child find responsibilities under Part B and Part C of the federal individuals with disabilities education act, as amended, to agencies, districts, and schools that participate in the location, evaluation, and identification of children who may be eligible for early intervention services or special education services.

(2) To the extent funds are made available, by September 1, 2008, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the department of health and the department of social and health services, shall develop posters to be distributed to medical offices and clinics, grocery stores, and other public places with information on autism and how parents can gain access to the diagnosis and identification of autism and contact information for services and support. These must be made available on the internet for ease of distribution.

[ 2008 c 220 s 2.]